New York, session 2025-2026, A5487.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 253 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 4 mortgage recording tax shall not be imposed upon any mortgage executed 5 by a veteran, as defined in section one of the veterans' services law, 6 who is a first time homebuyer. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05422-01-5